Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-315
Auditor; seal; evidentiary effect.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall keep a seal of office for the authentication of all papers, writings and documents required to be certified by him, and copies, so authenticated and certified, of all papers and documents lawfully deposited in his office, shall be received in evidence as the original.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 16, p. 24;

R.S.1913, § 5557;

C.S.1922, § 4859;

C.S.1929, § 84-315;

R.S.1943, § 84-315.

Bond history was competent evidence to prove village board proceedings. Belza v. Village of Emerson, 159 Neb. 651, 68 N.W.2d 272 (1955).